Missouri, session 2026, HB2126.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 168.410, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 168.410 and 168.411, to read as follows:
168.410. 1. As used in this section and section 168.411, "building-level
administrator" means a school official who supervises or evaluates other licensed staff.
A building-level administrator may be a principal or an assistant principal.
2. School administrators [and], school district superintendents, and building-level
administrators shall be evaluated in the following manner:
(1) The board of education of each school district shall cause a comprehensive
performance-based evaluation for each administrator employed by the district. Such
evaluation shall be ongoing, specific, and of sufficient specificity and frequency to provide
for demonstrated standards of competency and academic ability. A building-level
administrator shall be evaluated no less than once per contract year;
(2) All evaluations shall be:
(a) Maintained in the respective administrator's personnel file at the office of the
board of education of the school district. A copy of each evaluation shall be provided to the
person being evaluated and to the appropriate administrator; and
(b) Conducted using research-based evaluation tools that align with best
practices;
(3) All evaluations may be based on multiple rating categories as determined by
the governing board; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 2126 & 2197 2
[(3)] (4) The state department of elementary and secondary education shall provide
suggested procedures for the evaluations performed under this section.
168.411. 1. As used in this section, "nonrenewal" or "nonrenewed" means, when
referring to a contract of a building-level administrator, such contract is not extended
beyond the current term provided for in such contract.
2. (1) Each school district employing a building-level administrator shall
provide written notification of contract renewal or nonrenewal no later than March first
in the year the contract expires.
(2) No building-level administrator's contract shall be renewed or nonrenewed
prior to such building-level administrator being evaluated as required under section
168.410.
(3) (a) A school district shall present a contract to each building-level
administrator whose contract has been renewed.
(b) The building-level administrator shall accept or reject such contract in
writing within fifteen business days after receiving the contract.
3. (1) Any building-level administrator shall have the right to request a written
statement of reasons for nonrenewal of such building-level administrator's contract
within ten business days after receiving such nonrenewal notice. The school district
shall provide the reasons for such nonrenewal in writing within ten business days of
receipt of the request.
(2) A building-level administrator who receives such nonrenewal notice has the
right to a closed-session hearing before the school board within ten business days of
receiving the notice.
✔